Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Unified Government

7-21-201. Charter commission — Creation — Procedure — Commissioners — Organizational meeting — Vacancies — Officers.

The initial step in the creation of a unified government shall be the creation of a charter commission. The charter commission may be initiated either by a proclamation of the chief executive officer of the county or by resolution of the county legislative body. Such proclamation must be ratified by the county legislative body, or the resolution of the county legislative body must be adopted by a majority vote of all members constituting the county legislative body. The proclamation or resolution shall provide that a charter commission is established to propose to the people the unification of all governmental and corporate functions of the county and its principal city and the creation of a unified government for the administration of the unified functions. Any proclamation under this section shall also identify and appoint the eight (8) individual members of the charter commission pursuant to subsection (c). Any resolution under this section shall authorize or direct the chief executive officer of the county to appoint the eight (8) individual members of the charter commission pursuant to subsection (c) within a specified period of time, not to exceed thirty (30) days. The proclamation or resolution shall fix the time and place for the county clerk to convene the initial meeting of the charter commission, and shall fix the date by which the charter commission must certify and file copies of the proposed charter with the county clerk and the clerks of the city legislative body of each municipality in the county. Within five (5) days from the effective date of the proclamation or resolution, the clerk of the county legislative body shall certify a copy of the proclamation or resolution to the clerk of the city legislative body of the principal city within the county and to the clerk of the city legislative body of each smaller city within the county. The county proclamation or resolution shall become void unless the city legislative body of the principal city ratifies a substantially similar proclamation or adopts a substantially similar resolution within sixty (60) days of receipt of the certified county proclamation or resolution. The proclamation of the mayor of the principal city shall also identify and appoint the eight (8) individual members of the charter commission pursuant to subsection (c). The resolution of the principal city shall authorize or direct the mayor of the principal city to appoint the eight (8) individual members of the charter commission pursuant to subsection (c) within a specified period of time not to exceed thirty (30) days. The mayor and city legislative body of the principal city may also initiate the creation of a charter commission by complying with the provisions of this subsection (a) applicable to the chief executive officer of the county and the county legislative body. The county may validate the charter commission by complying with the provisions of this subsection (a) applicable to the mayor and the city legislative body of the principal city.

Within thirty (30) days of ratification of a substantially similar proclamation or the adoption of a substantially similar resolution by the city legislative body of the principal city or by the county legislative body, as applicable, as set forth in subsection (a), the mayor of each smaller city within the county shall appoint one (1) member of the charter commission; provided, that the failure of the mayor of any smaller city to timely appoint such member shall not delay or prohibit the convening of the charter commission or in any way affect the right of the county and principal city to proceed in all respects under this chapter.

The charter commission shall be composed of eight (8) charter commissioners appointed by the chief executive officer of the county, eight (8) charter commissioners appointed by the mayor of the principal city, and one (1) charter commissioner appointed by the mayor of any smaller city within the county electing to participate by the timely appointment of a charter commission member. At least one (1) charter commissioner from the principal city and at least one (1) charter commissioner from the county shall be an official or employee of the appointing participating governmental unit.

The county clerk shall call and convene members of the charter commission to hold an organizational meeting at such time and place as are provided in the certified proclamations or resolutions adopted in accordance with this section.

Any vacancy occurring in the office of a charter commissioner shall be filled by the governmental entity making the original appointment in the same manner as the original appointment.

The charter commission shall elect from its membership a chair, a chair pro tempore, a secretary and such other officers as it may deem necessary.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 201.

Attorney General Opinions. Adoption of metropolitan government, OAG 06-100 (6/12/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109.

7-21-202. Expenses of charter commission — Funding — Staff — Compensation of staff and members.

It is the duty of the county legislative body to appropriate sufficient funds to defray the expenses of the charter commission, which appropriation shall be not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Such funds shall be disbursed by the fiscal officer of the county upon appropriate documentation signed by the chair or the secretary of the charter commission.

The charter commission is authorized to employ such staff as may be required to assist in performing its duties, which staff shall be paid compensation as determined by the charter commission within the limits of funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (a).

Members of the charter commission shall not receive per diem or other compensation for their services except reimbursement of actual expenses authorized and approved by the charter commission.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 202.

7-21-203. Information and assistance from public officials.

All public officials shall, upon request, furnish the charter commission with all information and assistance necessary or appropriate for its work.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 203.

7-21-204. Meetings — Preparation and filing of proposed charter — Action by legislative bodies — Publication of proposed charter.

All meetings of the charter commission shall be held in compliance with the open meetings law, compiled in title 8, chapter 44.

The charter commission shall prepare and file the charter proposed by it not later than the date provided in the proclamations or resolutions creating the charter commission, or within such extended limit of time as may be authorized by resolutions of the respective legislative bodies of the county and principal city.

The chair of the charter commission shall certify and file two (2) copies of such proposed charter with the county clerk and one (1) copy with the clerk of the city legislative body of each municipality in the county. Such copies shall be public records, available for inspection or examination by any interested person. Within sixty (60) days from the certifications and filings under this subdivision (c)(1), the county legislative body and the city legislative body of the principal city shall either endorse or disapprove the proposed charter. Failure to act within the required time shall be deemed to be a favorable endorsement by the subject legislative body.

Within the sixty-day period provided in subdivision (c)(1), the city legislative body of each smaller city shall, by resolution, elect and determine whether or not to direct the county election commission to place on the ballots to be used only by voters within such smaller city a question for such voters, in addition to the question of consolidation of principal city and county governmental functions, which additional question shall be stated as follows:

For the city (town) of surrendering its charter, terminating its separate existence, thereby becoming a part of the home rule unified government.

Against the city (town) of surrendering its charter, terminating its separate existence, thereby becoming a part of the home rule unified government

Failure of any smaller city legislative body to act within the required time shall be deemed to be a favorable determination to place such question upon the ballots to be used by voters within the smaller city at the time the issue of unification is presented to the voters of the county in which the smaller city is located.

Within five (5) days following the favorable endorsement or disapproval by the city legislative body of the principal city, and within five (5) days following the passage of the resolution or resolutions to place or not to place the additional questions set forth in subdivision (c)(2) upon the ballot of the respective smaller city or cities, the clerk of the city legislative body of each respective municipality shall certify a copy of such legislative bodies' resolution or resolutions to the county clerk and shall cause a copy of such resolution or resolutions to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the county.

After action, if any, by the county legislative body and receipt of certifications, if any, from each of the clerks of the city legislative bodies of each of the principal city and smaller city or cities, or following the expiration of seventy (70) days from the receipt from the chair of the charter commission of the certified proposed charter, whichever shall first occur, the county clerk shall promptly file with the county election commission one (1) copy of such certified proposed charter, together with the certified resolutions of endorsement or disapproval, if any, of the county legislative body and of the city legislative body of the principal city and certified resolutions, if any, of the smaller city or cities directing or denying placement of the additional question on the ballot of the smaller city or cities.

The charter commission shall furnish or make available to every daily or weekly newspaper published in the county a complete copy of the proposed charter. The charter commission shall take such other steps within the limitation of its available funds as it deems reasonable and appropriate to inform the public throughout the county of the contents of the proposed charter, and the same may be published or summarized in pamphlets and booklets to be made available for general distribution.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 204.

7-21-205. Referendum election — Ballots — Notice — Canvassing of returns — When charter deemed ratified and adopted — Certification of returns — Publication of election results — Copies of adopted charters.

After a copy of the proposed charter has been certified to the county election commission and the proposed charter has been, in all respects, qualified to be submitted to the voters of the principal city and to the voters of the county outside the principal city, including any smaller city or cities, as provided in § 7-21-204, and, if applicable, to the voters of any smaller city or cities electing to proceed in accordance with § 7-21-204(c)(2), it is the duty of the county election commission to hold a referendum election for the ratification or rejection of the proposed charter and additional question, if applicable, at such regular county, state or federal election as shall be designated in the proposed charter.

The ballots used in the election shall have printed on them a brief summary of the proposed charter as required by § 2-5-208(f). The ballots shall be prepared so as to provide a choice for voters as follows:

For a Home Rule Unified Government Charter .

Against a Home Rule Unified Government Charter .

Notice of the referendum election shall be given as required in other elections on questions submitted to the vote of the people.

The date of the election and the form of the ballot shall be uniform throughout the entire county on the issue as to whether there shall be a unified government between the principal city and the area within the county outside of the principal city, including any smaller cities within the county; provided, that the county election commission shall canvass the returns and certify the results as if separate elections were being held for the principal city and the area of the county outside of the principal city, including any smaller cities within the county. For the purpose of determining whether the proposed charter has been accepted or rejected, the county election commission shall canvass the returns and certify the results for:

The principal city;

The entire area of the county outside the principal city, including in such area the smaller cities, if any, within the county; and

Any smaller city that has elected to include the additional question provided in § 7-21-204(c)(2) on the ballots for the voters of such smaller city.

The proposed charter shall be deemed ratified and adopted if the same is approved by a majority of those voting within the principal city and a majority of those voting in the county outside the principal city. Any smaller city, if applicable, shall be included in the unified government only if inclusion is approved by majority vote of those voting within the smaller city.

The returns of the referendum election shall be certified by the county election commission to the secretary of state, together with a copy of the charter previously filed with the county election commission by the county clerk.

The secretary of state shall then issue a proclamation showing the result of the election on the adoption or rejection of the proposed charter, and the inclusion, if applicable, of any smaller city, one (1) copy of which proclamation shall be attached to the copy of the charter certified to the secretary of state and one (1) copy of which shall be delivered to the county clerk, who shall attach the proclamation to the remaining copy of the proposed charter certified to the county clerk.

Whenever a unified government charter has been adopted, the two (2) certified copies with proclamations attached shall be deemed duplicate original copies of the charter of such government.

The certified copy of the charter and proclamation deposited with the county clerk shall subsequently be delivered by the county clerk to such officer of the unified government as the charter may direct.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 205.

Attorney General Opinions. Voting under Charter Government Unification Act and Metropolitan Government Act. OAG 10-51, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (4/15/10).

7-21-206. Unified government — Name — Effective date — Executive, legislative and judicial powers — Required provisions of charter.

The name of the unified government shall be such name as the charter commission shall deem historically and geographically appropriate.

The proposed charter shall provide for the effective date of the unified government.

The proposed charter shall provide for a single government possessing three (3) branches of government, executive, legislative and judicial, with due regard for the doctrine of separation of powers as known and practiced in the American form of representative or republican government.

All executive powers of the unified government shall be vested in a chief executive officer whose title shall be determined by the charter commission.

All legislative powers of the unified government shall be vested in a legislative body whose title and size shall be determined by the charter commission; provided, that the members shall be elected by districts and shall be not less than nine (9) nor more than nineteen (19) members.

The courts established by general law shall constitute the judicial branch, but the proposed charter may vest additional jurisdiction of local ordinances to the extent not prohibited by general law. Such courts as are established by private act or by public act having local application may be continued by charter provisions.

Within the general restrictions contained in this section, the proposed charter may organize the executive and legislative branches as the charter commission deems necessary and appropriate for the efficient and economical delivery of public services befitting the particular county.

Any functions of the governing bodies of the county, the principal city or any smaller city electing to be included, or functions of the officers of the governing bodies that the charter commission may deem feasible to carry forward into the unified government, to the extent that such functions are not set forth in the Constitution of Tennessee, shall be set forth in the charter.

Any right, power, duty or obligation of any officer or agency of the county, the principal city or any smaller city electing to be included, deemed by the charter commission to be feasible to carry forward into the unified government, and not set forth in the Constitution of Tennessee, shall be set forth in the charter.

The charter shall expressly provide the means, as determined to be necessary and appropriate by the charter commission, by which the indebtedness and contract obligations of the county and the principal city and any smaller city electing to be included shall not be impaired or diminished.

The charter shall set forth the procedure for the subsequent merger of the government of any smaller city into the unified government.

The date of such regular county, state or federal election at which the referendum election shall be held for the ratification or rejection of the proposed charter shall be set forth in the proposed charter.

The charter shall designate the officer with whom the official copy of the charter of the unified government shall permanently repose.

The charter shall provide for the consolidation of county and city employees' retirement and pension systems and the regulation of the retirement and pension systems; provided, that nothing in this chapter or in a charter adopted pursuant to these provisions shall impair or diminish the rights and privileges of the city and county employees in the existing city and county employees' retirement and pension systems in effect at the time of establishment of the unified government.

The charter shall provide for the maintenance and administration of an effective consolidated civil service system and the regulation of a civil service system; provided, that nothing in this chapter or in a charter adopted pursuant to these provisions shall impair or diminish the rights and privileges of city and county employees as provided for in any city charter, county ordinance or general state law at the time of the establishment of the unified government.

The charter shall contain or incorporate into the charter such terms and provisions as are contained in any private act or municipal charter with respect to any utility created, authorized or owned by the principal city that is supported by its own revenues and operated, administered and managed pursuant to the private act or municipal charter. Such terms and provisions as are required by this subsection (p) may be subsequently amended only pursuant to subsection (q).

The charter shall provide for the method and procedure by which the charter may subsequently be amended; provided, that no such amendment shall be effective until submitted to the qualified voters residing within the geographical jurisdiction of the unified government and approved by a majority of those voters voting on the amendment.

The charter shall provide for a determination of the proportionate responsibility for the existing bonded indebtedness, contract obligations and pension obligations of the county and any unified municipality, and shall provide for the creation and establishment of such taxing districts as are necessary and appropriate to fairly allocate such obligations.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 206.

Attorney General Opinions. A metropolitan government charter could provide for a city manager, OAG 06-100 (6/12/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109.